District of Columbia statutes.
29-1004.01

Authority to amend organic rules.

(a)

A limited cooperative association may amend its organic rules under this subchapter for any lawful purpose. In addition, the initial board of directors may amend the bylaws of an association under § 29-1003.04.

(b)

Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, a member shall not have a vested property right resulting from any provision in the organic rules, including a provision relating to the management, control, capital structure, distribution, entitlement, purpose, or duration of the limited cooperative association.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 401 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act.
This section is referenced in § 29-1004.02.